Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3908
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the effective administration of sections 44-3901 to 44-3908 pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1982, LB 274, § 8;

Laws 2018, LB743, § 23.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.